texmf/tex/generic/hiptex/cshyphts.tex
%This code was written by Dimitri Vulis and placed into public domain.
%There is no copyright associated with this code. Use it as you wish.
%
% This code has been rearranged by Sergei Klioner to use coding
% of Russian letters accepted in Russia on IBM PCs
%
\message{Russian hyphenation(Russian coding)}
%Set up lower and upper case translation tables
\catcode '0136 = 12
\catcode '0137 = 12
\catcode '0176 = 12
\lccode39=39 % 
\lccode95=95 % 
\lccode96=96 % 
\lccode61=61 % 
\lccode94=94 % 
\lccode126=126 % 
\lccode161=161 % 
\lccode162=162 % 
\lccode163=163 % 
\lccode164=164 % 
\lccode165=165 % 
\lccode'33='33 % 
\lccode166=166 % 
\lccode167=167 % 
{%
\patterns{
а1а
аа6б
а1ба
а1бе
абе3с
а1би
а1бо
а1бр
а1бу
абу'2
а1бх
а1бы
а1бье
а1бьи
а1бью
а1бья
а1бю
а1бя
а2в
а1ва
а5ве
а5ви
а1во
а2вот
а1ву
авша2
а1вы
а1вье
а1вьи
а1вью
а1вья
а1вю
а1вя
а1г
а1га
ага5с6
а5гв
аг1д
а1ге
а1ги
а1гл
а1го
1агро
а3гу
а1гы
а1гье
а1гьи
а1гью
а1гья
а1гю
а1гя
а1д
а1да
ад1аге
ада'2
а5дви
а1де
а1дж
а1ди
ади2о
1адм
а1до
а1дра
ад5рез
а1ду
а1дц
а1ды
адь2
а1дье
а1дьи
а1дью
а1дья
а1дю
а1дя
а1е
а1жа
а1же
а1жж
а1жи
а1жм
а1жо
а1жу
а1жье
а1жьи
а1жью
а1жья
а1жю
а1жя
а1за
аз1ве
аз1ви
аз1во
аз1да
а1зе
а1зи
а1зо
аз1р
а5з6у
азъ1
а1зы
а1зье
а1зьи
а1зью
а1зья
а1зю
а1зя
а1и
аи2г
аи6з5
аи2ни
а2их
аи'т2
ай2ма
а1к
а1ка
а1ке
а1ки
ак1н
а1ко
акоп5л
ак1с
а1ку
а1кы
а1кье
а1кьи
а1кью
а1кья
а1кю
а1кя
а1ла
1алг
а1ле
а5ли
али'2
а1ло
а1лу
а1лы
а1лье
а1льи
а1лью
а1лья
а1лю
а1ля
2а1ма
а1ме
а1ми
а1мно
а1мо
1ампе
а1му
ам1ч
а1мы
а1мье
а1мьи
а1мью
а1мья
а1мю
а1мя
а1н
а1на
а1не
а1ни
а6нинс
ан2кр
а1но
а2н1об
а1нр
ан2скр
ан2сп
анс1у
ан2сур
ан2сц
а1ну
а2н5уз
а1ны
а1нье
а1ньи
а1нью
а1нья
а1ню
а1ня
2а3о
ао6к
ао2п
ао2с
а1п
а1па
а1пе
а1пи
а1по
1апп
а1пу
а1пы
а1пье
а1пьи
а1пью
а1пья
а1пю
а1пя
а1р
а1р6а
а1ре
а1ри
а1ро
ар2т1ор
а1ру
а1ры
а1рье
а1рьи
а1рью
а1рья
а1рю
а2ря
а1с
а1са
а1се
асе5п
а1си
ас1к
ас1л
ас5лет
ас5лям
ас5лях
ас5ми
а1со
а2сп2
ас3по
ас1пу
асс6п
а1ста
аст1ву
а1сте
а1сти
а2с1тир
а1сто
ас1трог
а5стры
а1сту
а1сты
а1стье
а1стьи
а1стью
а1стья
а1стю
а1стя
а6с5тяг
а6стян
а1су
ас1х
ас1ч
а1с2ше
а1сы
а1сье
а1сьи
а1сью
а1сья
а1сю
а1ся
а1т
а1та
1атак
ат5ви
а1те
ате2с1
а1ти
а1то
а6томн
а1тр
а1ту
а1ты
а1тье
а1тьи
а1тью
а1тья
а1тю
а1тя
а1у1
а2уле
а2ум
а2ун
а2ус
ау5ск
аут1р
ау2чи
а2уэ
а1ф
а1фа
а1фе
а1фи
а1фо
а1фу
а1фье
а1фьи
а1фью
а1фья
а1фю
а1фя
а1ха
а1хе
а1хи
а1хо
а1ху
а1хы
а1хье
а1хьи
а1хью
а1хья
а1хю
а1хя
а1ц
а1ца
а1це
а1ци
а1цо
а1цу
а1ча
а1че
аче'2
а1чи
а1ч2не
ач5та
а1чу
а1чье
а1чьи
а1чью
а1чья
а1ша
а1ше
а1ши
а1шо
аш1та
а1шу
а1шье
а1шьи
а1шью
а1шья
а5щ
а1ща
а1ще
а1щи
а1що
а1щу
а1щье
а1щьи
а1щью
а1щья
а1ы
а1э1
а2эр
а1ю
а1я
ая2з
а2яй
а1w
ба1с2к
бас1м
б1аэ
ба'2м
6б1б
5бв
б1ва
б1во
б1вя
6б1г
2б1д
1бе
бег1л
бе1др
без5в
без1д2
бе2з1и
бе2ск
2бес3п
бесс2
бе2ста
бес1ч
б1ж
б1з6
бза'2
бзд6
1би
5би2о
био5с
би5стр
2б5к
1бл
б1лав
2блас
2блд
2бле
б1лег
бле2с1к
б5лиза
б5лим
бл1исп
б1лож
б1лом
2бль
6б1м
2б1н
бо1д6р
бо1жж
бо1з
б5оке
б5орб
бо1рв
борт5
бор6тр
бо1с
босо2б1
бос2с
5бот
бо1т2л
5боц
бп5л
б1р
2бр.
бра6сл
1бри
б1рыв
б5рыг
б5рыд
2брь
6б1с2
бст6
2б1т
1бу
2бу.
бу1г
б1ф
б1х
2б1ц
б1ч
б1ш
6б1щ
бъ1
бь1яв
1бю
1бя
1бi
1ва
1ваг
ва1д
5вак
5вале
ван5с6
вах1
5вая
в1б
в6би
в1в
в1г
в1д
вдо1с
1вег
ве5др
вез1до
1велл
вео2с
1вер.
ве2ст1в
1вз2
взыс5
1ви
ви2ам
виа5с
ви5аф
ви2зн
вин6др
5винт
6в5инф
5винч
ви5ол
ви5он
1вих
1вич
ви'2в
в1к
вк1н
в6кус
2в1л
2в1лаб
в1лаг
2в1лес
вли6е
6в5лик
6в5лич
2вль
в1ма
2в1ми
в1мо
в6мого
в6моч
в1н
в2нуш
2во.
1вов
во1вк
воз1в
вои2с
1вок
2волю
во1п
вос1к
во2стр
1воя
1вп
впо6л
1вр2
2вр.
вра2ж5д
в5рас
6в5рац
6в5риты
в5рор
вро5т
в1р_
в1с2
1в2са
в6сег
6вск
1в2сп
1в2сх
1в2сю
в1т
вто3к2
1ву
5вуа
ву5г
1вуд
ву1з
ву2х1
2вую.
2вуя
в1ф
в1х
в6ход
в1ц
в1ча
вче6т5
в1чи
в1ш
1в2шив
в1щ
2въ
1вы
вы5п
вы1ск
вы5сп
вы1х
вы1ш
в1э
1вю
1вi
1га
га5др
га1ст
га2у
га'ю2
2г1б
г1в
2г2г
г1д
ге2н1ин
ге6об
ге2од
ге2оп
ге2ос
ге2оц
г1з
ги1с
2г1к
гко1в
6гл.
6г5лай
1глам
5глем
г1ляе
г1лят
г1ляю
2г1м
г1ни
1годи
1гож
го1з
го1п
1гор
го2с1а
го2сб
гос1к
гос3с
го2с1тр
го1сш
2г1п
1гр
6грек
2гроп
2г1с
2г5т
2г1х
г1ц
2г1ч
2г1ш
2гъ
г1э
да2ген
2далг
да2пр
6д1б
д2в
д1ва
д1ве
две2с1к
д1вид
1движ
1двиз
5двину
д1вис
д1вод
дву1ш
д1г2
д1д
5деб
де1гл
де2з1а2
де2з1и2о
де2з1о2
де2о
дес2к
де1ст
де5х
1де'н
5джа
дж1м
дж1р
6дз.
д1за
1дзе.
д5зем
д5зи
д1зо
ди2ад
ди2ам
2дил
2д1инф
1диню
ди2об
ди5он
ди2о5с
дип5т
ди2с1е
ди2сто
дис1тр
ди5х
2д1к
д1л
1д2лев
5д6лей
1д2лил
2д1м
дмо1с
д2мс
2д1н
1дневн
дно5д
2дны
1дняш
5до.
2д1обл
до6бла
до1бр
6добъ
1дов
до1д2
до1з
2докт
до5мно
до1п
до5рва
до2ру
2д1о2си
до1сн
до1с2п
5дот
6дотд
дото1
1доч
до1ш2
1до'х
д1п
2д1р
2др.
д2ра
1д6раж
д1рас
д6рая
д1реж
1дроб
6д5роз
1дром
2дрс
д1руб
д1рыв
д1ряд
2д1с
дс3кн
д1т
1дун
ду2о
ду1п
ду1ст
1ду`
2д1ф
д1х
2д1ч
2д1ш2
2дъ1
6дь.
1дье
5дью
1дья
д1э
дi2я
е1а
еа6да
еа2де
еа2з
е1б
е1ба
е1бе
е1би
е1бо
е2бр
е1бу
е1бы
е1бье
е1бьи
е1бью
е1бья
е1бю
е1бя
е1в
е1ва
е1ве
е1ви
ев6ку
е2вн
ев2ним
ев2нят
е1во
6евол
ево2с
ев2п
2евр
е2вро
е1ву
ев1ч
е1вы
6евыд
е1вье
е1вьи
е1вью
е1вья
е1вю
е1вя
е1г
е1га
е1гд
е1ге
е1ги
ег1ла.
ег1ло
ег1лы
ег1н
ег6нат
е5г6но
е1го
е1гу
е1гы
е1гье
е1гьи
е1гью
е1гья
е1гю
е1гя
е1да
е2д1ап
е1де
е5дже
е1ди
е2д1ию
е1до
едоу5к
е1ду
е6д5у6г
е1ды
е1дье
е1дьи
е1дью
е1дья
е1дю
е1дя
е1дj
е1е2
е2ева
е6ема
е1жа
ежа6т
е1же
е1жж
е5жи
еж1м
е1жо
еж1р
е1жу
е1жье
е1жьи
е1жью
е1жья
е1жю
е1жя
е1за
ез5ви
ез1во
ез1да
ез1др
е1зе
е1зи
е1зо
е1зу
е1зы
е1зье
е1зьи
е1зью
е1зья
е1зю
е1зя
е1и
еи2г
еи2д
еи2м
е1ка
е1кв
е1ке
е1ки
ек1н
2е1ко
ек1ск
екс2п
ек1сту
е1ку
е1кы
е1кье
е1кьи
е1кью
е1кья
е1кю
е1кя
е1ла
е1ле
е1ли
е1ло
е1лу
е1лы
ель1
е1лье
е1льи
е1лью
е1лья
е1лю
е1ля
2е1ма
е1ме
е5ми
е1м2н
ем1не
е1мо
е1му
ем1ч
е1мы
е1мье
е1мьи
е1мью
е1мья
е1мю
е1мя
е1на
е1не
е1ни
е1но
2енр
ен5ре
ен1ри
е1ну
е1ны
е1нье
е1ньи
е1нью
е1нья
е1ню
е1ня
2е1о
ео2б
еоб1л
е2оди
ео2ж
ео2кон
е5ол.
е3ола
е5олы
е5оля
е3он.
е2она
ео2пр
е2оро
ео2ру
ео1с
ео2са
ео6св
ео2се
ео6су
ео6хв
е5охл
ео2ч
ео6ш
ео2щ
е1п
е1па
е1пе
е1пи
еп1ле
еп5ли.
е1по
еп1та
еп5те
еп5тич
еп1то
еп5тур
е1пу
е1пы
е1пье
е1пьи
е1пью
е1пья
е1пю
е1пя
е1ра
ер1аэ
ер1ват
е1ре
ере5гн
ере1дв
ере1зв
ере1п
ере1сс
е1ри
ерис2
ери1ск
ер6кл
е1ро
еро6б
ер1т
ер5тли
ер1тя
е1ру
е2р1у2п
ер2хи
е1ры
е1рье
е1рьи
е1рью
е1рья
е1рю
е1ря
е1с
е1са
е1сб
ес5ва
е1с2г
е1сд
е1се
е1си
е1ск
ескрип1
ес5кур
е1см
е1со
ес1п
е2с3пу
ес5ра
е1ста
е5ста.
ес1тар
е1ств
е2сте
е2сти
е6стиг
е1сто
е1стр
е1сту
е1сты
е1стье
е1стьи
е1стью
е1стья
е1стю
е1стя
е1су
е1сы
е1сье
е1сьи
е1сью
е1сья
е1сю
е1ся
е1та
е1тв
е1те
е1ти
е1тл
е1то
етора5
е1тр
е1ту
е1ты
е1тье
е1тьи
е1тью
е1тья
е1тю
е1тя
е1у2
еу3то
е1фа
е1фе
е1фи
е1фо
е1фу
е1фье
е1фьи
е1фью
е1фья
е1фю
е1фя
е1ха
е1хе
е1хи
ех1м
е1хо
ех5об
е1ху
е1хы
е1хье
е1хьи
е1хью
е1хья
е1хю
е1хя
е1ца
е1це
е1ци
е1цо
е1цу
е1ча
е1че
е1чи
е2чт
е1чу
е1чье
е1чьи
е1чью
е1чья
е1ш
е1ша
е1ше
е1ши
е1шл
е1шо
е1шта
еш1то
е1шу
е1шье
е1шьи
е1шью
е1шья
е1ща
е1ще
е1щи
е1що
е1щу
е1щье
е1щьи
е1щью
е1щья
е1ы
е1э
е1ю
е2я
е1w
е'2зр
2е`
е1s
1жа
2жаве
жат1в
жа'2е
ж1б
1жг
2ж1д
6жд.
2ждл
2ждь
5жев
же5д2
же2о
2ж1ж
ж2же
ж1з
2ж1к
жко1
ж1л
ж1ма
1жму
2ж1н
2ж1о2с
ж1п
ж1с
ж1т
2ж1ц
ж1ч
2ж1ш
ж5э
1за
за1вч
за1г2
за1др
зае2
за1з2
за1кв
з1акт
зан5с6
за5п6ну
за1р2ж
за1с
зас2н
зат2
за5тв
за3тм
за5у
за1х
за1ш
за2шк
зая6
2з1б2
зв2
зве2д
з5вет
зве2т3в
з1вк
з1во
з6вон
1зву
з1вя
з1вj
з1г2
з5гна
зг1ну
з1д
з5да.
з1дв
з1де
з1ди
зди2с
2здн
з5дом
здро2
з1ду
з1ды
з1дя
6з1ж
з1з2
1зи
зи5дв
зи6ни
2з1инт
2з1инф
зи6оно
3зис
2з1к
з1л
6з1м
з6мс
з1н
2зна.
6зная
з1не
з1ни
з1но
з1ну
2зны
5зо.
зо1б
зо1д2р
зо1з2
зок2
з1окс
1зол
зо5м6
з1оп
зо1рв
з1орг
зо1с2
зо1щ
з1п
з1р
з1ра
з2рак
з2рач
з5рез
5зри
з1род
6з1ру
з1ря
2з1с2
з1т
1зу
2з1у2с
з1ц
з1ч
з1ш
зъя5в
5зью
з1э
1зw
1зj
и1а
и2а1г
и2ап
иас2
иа1ск
и2аф
2и1б
и1ба
и1бе
и1би
и1бо
и1бу
и1бы
и1бье
и1бьи
и1бью
и1бья
и1бю
и1бя
и1ва
и1ве
и1ви
и1во
и1в2с
и1ву
2и1вы
и1вье
и1вьи
и1вью
и1вья
и1вю
и1вя
и1г
и1га
и5гд
и1ге
и1ги
и1гл
иг1н
и1го
и1гу
и1гы
и1гье
и1гьи
и1гью
и1гья
и1гю
и1гя
и1д2
и1да
и1де
и2дей
и1ди
иди5а
иди3ом
и1до
и1др
и1ду
ид1ц
и1ды
и1дье
и1дьи
и1дью
и1дья
и1дю
и1дя
и1е
и1жа
и1же
и1жж
и1жи
и1жо
и1жу
и1жье
и1жьи
и1жью
и1жья
и1жю
и1жя
и1за
из1в
из2ва
из2гн
изг1не
из1д
и1зе
и1зи
и1зна
и1зо
изо2о
изо1т
и1зр
из5ре
и1зу
изъ5
и1зы
изы1с
и1зье
и1зьи
и1зью
и1зья
и1зю
и1зя
и1и
ии2з
и1ка
и1кв
и1ке
и1ки
ик1н
и1ко1
ик1ск
икс1ту
и1ку
и5к6ч
и1кы
и1кье
и1кьи
и1кью
и1кья
и1кю
и1кя
и1ла
и2л1а2ц
и1ле
иле1п
и1ли
и1ло
и1лу
и1лы
и1лье
и1льи
и1лью
и1лья
и1лю
и1ля
илjь2
и1ма
и1ме
2имене
и2мено
2имень
и5ми
им1н
и1мо
и1му
и1мы
и1мье
и1мьи
и1мью
и1мья
и1мю
и1мя
и1на
ин1атом
ина'2
и1не
5инж
и1ни
и1но
ино5с
ин1р
инс2
5инсп
и1ну
и1ны
и1нье
и1ньи
и1нью
и1нья
и1н1ю
и1ня
и1о
и2ок6
и5оле
и2опр
и3орт
иос2
и2о1ск
ио5сп
ио2ста
и2ох
и2оц
6ип
и1па
и5пе
и1пи
и1пл
и2п1лы
и1по
и1пс
и6п5тиз
ип1ту
и1пу
и1пы
и1пье
и1пьи
и1пью
и1пья
и1пю
и1пя
и1р
и1ра
ир5в
и1ре
и1ри
и1ро
и1ру
и1ры
и1рье
и1рьи
и1рью
и1рья
и1рю
и1ря
и1с
и1са
ис1б
и1се
и1си
ис1к
иск1н
и2с1л
ис1м
и1с2ни
и1со
ис1п
ис2пас
и1ста
ист1в
и1сте
ис1тек
ис5тец
и1сти
и1сто
и1стра
и1сту
и1сты
и1стье
и1стьи
и1стью
и1стья
и1стю
и1стя
и1су
ис1ч
и2съ
и1сы
и1сье
и1сьи
и1сью
и1сья
и1сю
и1ся
и5та
ит1ва
ит1ве
ит5ву
и1те
и1ти
и1тл
и1то
и6тот
и1тр
и1ту
и2т1уп
ит1уч
и1ты
и1тье
и1тьи
и1тью
и1тья
и1тю
и1тя
и1тi
и1у
иу2г
иу6р
иу2ч
и1фа
и1фе
и1фи
и1фо
и1фу
и1фье
и1фьи
и1фью
и1фья
и1фю
и1фя
и1ха
и1хе
и1хи
и1хо
и1ху
и1хы
и1хье
и1хьи
и1хью
и1хья
и1хю
и1хя
и1ца
и1це
и1ци
и1цо
и1цу
и1ча
и1че
и1чи
и1чу
и1чье
и1чьи
и1чью
и1чья
и1ш
и1ша
и1ше
и1ши
и1шл
и1шо
и1ш2п
и1шу
и1шье
и1шьи
и1шью
и1шья
и2ща
и1ще
и1щи
и1що
и1щу
и1щье
и1щьи
и1щью
и1щья
и1ы
и1э
и1ю
и2юл
и2юн
и1я
ия2д
и'2с
и=2
и^д2
й1
й2дв
й2дн
й2д1р
йер5
йко5п
й2ль
йм1а
й5о
й2п1т
й2с1б
йс1кур
й2сн
й6с5тр
й2стj
й6с5ф
й2сш
й2х
йх2ск
1кав
ка1д
1кае
2казк
кам5н
1кап
ка2п1л
кап6ла
ка1сп
ка1ст
1кат
ка1тл
ка3ус
2каф
1каю
2к1б
6кв.
2к1г
к1д
6кеа
ке5гли
ке5д
ке5пти
ке1ст
к5ж
1кив
кик1с
ки5о
2к1к
1к2л
2кл.
2к1лак
к5лий
2кль
2к1м
2кн
к1на
3к6ниж
к1но
5коа
5ковы
ког2н
ко1д2н
ко5зн
ко2мин
1комп
1кон
1коо
копу5
кор1в
к1орг
5коры
1кос
ко2св
ко1ск
кос1мо
кос5н
ко5ств
2кот
ко1т2л
1кош
ко'й2
к1п
1кр
6кр.
кри2о5
2кс
к6св
к1ски
к2с1л
к6с1м
кс1п
к5сте.
кс1тр
к1сх
к5сю
2к1т
5к6то.
куг1
кус1к
ку6тл
1куш
6к1ф
к1х
2к1ц
к1ч
2к1ш
2къ
к1э
2к1я
1кw
ла2г1л
ла2да
1лаж
1ланд
лау1
л1ба
л1би
л1бо
л5бы
л1в
л6вк
л1г
л2гат
л1д6
1ле
ле6в5ра
лег5л
1леде
ле2о
леп5ло
ле6ст5в
2лею
л1жа
л5ж6б
л1же
5л6жеш
л1жи
л1жь
л1за
л1зд
л1зе
л1зо
2лив
ли2в1л
5лиг
ли6ени
2лил
лио5
ли6ос
ли1пт
ли1спа
ли5стр
ли2тоб
ли6х5в
5лицо
5личи
л1к
лк1н
л1л
л2ль
ллю1
л1м
л6мщ
2л1н
лобо1
ло6бор
ло5вд
1ловл
ло5дж
ло1д6р
ло1з
ло2и
лон2
лос5ка
ло1ску
ло5ств
лох5л
л1п
6л1с2
л1т
л2тк
л6т5л
1лу
лу1д2
луе2
лу5с
лу5т
л1ф
л1х6
л1ц
л1ч
л1ча
л5че
л1чь
л1ш6
л1щ
1лы
6ль.
1льо
льс2
6льш
1лью
люк1в
2лю`с
1ля
1лj
1л_
1лi
1ма
ма2вз
1ма2г
маг1н
ма1сб
м6ат
ма2т1ан
ма5тв
ма2тоб
ма2у
мау2т
ма6чт
6м1б
2м1в2
м1г
1ме
5мед
ме2д1о
ме2ж1д
1мей
1мен.
ме2о
м1ж
м1з
1ми
ми6з5ан
2м1изд
5мий
5минг
ми2ню
м1к
1мкн
2м1л
м6ль
6м1м
м2м1н
м2м1ч
1м1на
м5неп
м5ний
м5нов
много1
м1ное
м1нос
м5нот
1мо
2моля
мо1м
1мон
мо3о
мо5п
моск1в
мо1ско
5моти
2мотп
6м1п
мп2л
мпо2ч
1м2р
м1с
м2сб
мс2н
м2с1ор
мс6п
мс2с
м2сти
6м1т
му5г
му5с6к
1мую
м1ф
м5х
м1ц
6м1че
м1чис
2м1ш
1мще
2мъ
1мы
1мы.
м5э
м1ю2с
1мя
1мw
1мj
1мi
1на.
1на1г
1над
на1з2
на2ил
на1кв
на1мн
5нап
на1рв
1на1с2
нау6ч
на1х
5нац
1на1ш2
на5э
3ная
н1б
н1в2
н1г
н2г1д
нгоу5
н1д
н2дв
нде2с5
нд6з
н2дл
н2дн
н6дт
н6дц
1не
не1в2д
6невк
2невн
не2вра
нев5рит
нев1ро
нев6т
не1гл
не1д
не1др
нее6
не1зн
неи2
не5кст
не1мн
не3о2гр
нео2п
нео2р
нео6сто
нео2х
нео2ц
не1п2
не5рж
нес2к
не1с2н
не1с2п
не1ст
не1с2ф
не5с6х
не1сч
неу5стр
нея6
н1ж
н1з
1ни
5ниб
2н1изд
3ник
ни5кт
нила6
нил5ам
ни5ок
ни5п
ни1стр
1ниц
н1к
нко1п
нк5ро
н1л
н1м
2н1н
1но.
но5е
но1з
1ной
1ном
ном5н
но5о
но1п
ноп6л
но2р
но1с
но1тв
2нотд
но5тк
1нох
но5ш
ноя1
н1п
н2р
6нр.
1нра
2н1с
н2с1в
н2с1д
н2с1ля
н2с1м
н2сн
нст2
нсу2р
н2сф
н1т
нтиа2
нтио2
н2тк
нт2р
н2трад
нтр1и2гр
нтр5у6п
1ну
нуз2
ну6зе
ну1ск
ну1тр
1ную
н1ф
н1х
2н1ц
н1ч
2н1ш
н1щ
2нъ1
3ны
2нь
1ньо
1нью
н1э
н2ю
ню2с
1ня
2няш
2о1а2
оанаби5
о6а5та
6о5ба
об1в
о1бе
1обес
о1би
об2л
о2благ
об5лик
об5лич
об1лу
о1бо
1о2боз
обо1л
о2бр
об5рад
об5рам
об5рас
о1бу
1объ
о1бы
о1бье
о1бьи
о1бью
о1бья
о1бю
о2бя
2о1в
о1ва
о1в2в
ов6да
о1ве
о1ви
ов5инт
ов2кл
о2вла
о1вм
ов2н
о1во1
овос6к
ово5стр
о6впр
о2вры
о1в2се
о1в2т
о1ву
